Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.140

Authority to contract for street and highway improvements.

A district has the same powers as a county or city to contract for street, road, or state highway improvement projects and to enter into reimbursement contracts provided for in chapter 35.72 RCW.

[ 2005 c 336 s 13; 1987 c 327 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.